California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(C) Any disallowance of a credit claimed due to a failure to provide verification under this paragraph shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. Any amount of tax resulting from such disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section
 19051.

(5) A tentative credit reservation provided to a taxpayer with respect to an employee of that taxpayer shall not constitute a determination by the Franchise Tax Board with respect to any of the requirements of this section regarding a taxpayer’s eligibility for the credit authorized by this section.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(1) Approve a tentative credit reservation with respect to a qualified full-time employee hired during a calendar year.

(2) Determine the aggregate tentative reservation amount and the aggregate small business tentative reservation amount for a calendar year.

(3) A tentative credit reservation request from a qualified taxpayer
 with respect to a qualified full-time employee who is a resident of a targeted employment area, as defined in former Section 7072 of the Government Code, as in effect on December 31, 2013, shall be expeditiously processed by the Franchise Tax Board. The residence of a qualified full-time employee in a targeted employment area shall have no other effect on the eligibility of an individual as a qualified full-time employee or the eligibility of a qualified taxpayer for the credit authorized by this section.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 19542, provide as a searchable database on its internet website, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2026, the employer names, amounts of tax credit claimed, and number of new jobs created for each taxable year pursuant to this section and Section 23626.

(g) (1) The Department of
 Finance shall, by January 1, 2014, and by January 1 of every fifth year thereafter, provide the Franchise Tax Board with a list of the designated census tracts and a list of census tracts with the lowest civilian unemployment rate.

(2) The redesignation of designated census tracts and lowest civilian unemployment census tracts by the Department of Finance as provided in Section 13073.5 of the Government Code shall be effective, for purposes of this credit, one year after the date the Department of Finance redesignates the designated census tracts.

(h) For purposes of this section:

(1) All employees of the trades or businesses that are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as employed by a single taxpayer.

(2) All employees of trades or businesses that are not incorporated, and that are under common control, shall be treated as employed by a single taxpayer.

(3) The credit, if any, allowable by this section with respect to each trade or business shall be determined by reference to its proportionate share of the expense of the qualified wages giving rise to the credit, and shall be allocated to that trade or business in that manner.

(4) Principles that apply in the case of controlled groups of corporations, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 23626, shall apply with respect to determining employment.

(5) If an employer acquires the major portion of a trade or business of another employer, hereinafter in this paragraph referred to as the predecessor, or the major portion of a separate unit of a trade
 or business of a predecessor, then, for purposes of applying this section, other than subdivision (i), for any taxable year ending after that acquisition, the employment relationship between a qualified full-time employee and an employer shall not be treated as terminated if the employee continues to be employed in that trade or business.

(i) (1) If the employment of any qualified full-time employee, with respect to whom qualified wages are taken into account under subdivision (a), is terminated by the qualified taxpayer at any time during the first 36 months after commencing employment with the qualified taxpayer, whether or not consecutive, the tax imposed by this part for the taxable year in which that employment is terminated shall be increased by an amount equal to the credit allowed under subdivision (a) for that taxable year and all prior taxable years attributable to qualified wages paid or incurred with respect to
 that employee.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any of the following:

(A) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee who voluntarily leaves the employment of the qualified taxpayer.

(B) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee who, before the close of the period referred to in paragraph (1), becomes disabled and unable to perform the services of that employment, unless that disability is removed before the close of that period and the qualified taxpayer fails to offer reemployment to that employee.

(C) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee, if it is determined that the termination was due to the misconduct, as defined in Sections 1256-30 to 1256-43, inclusive, of Title 22 of the
 California Code of Regulations, of that employee.

(D) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee due to a substantial reduction in the trade or business operations of the qualified taxpayer, including reductions due to seasonal employment.

(E) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee, if that employee is replaced by other qualified full-time employees so as to create a net increase in both the number of employees and the hours of employment.

(F) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee, when that employment is considered seasonal employment and the qualified employee is rehired on a seasonal basis.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), the employment relationship between the qualified taxpayer
 and a qualified full-time employee shall not be treated as terminated by reason of a mere change in the form of conducting the trade or business of the qualified taxpayer, if the qualified full-time employee continues to be employed in that trade or business and the qualified taxpayer retains a substantial interest in that trade or business.

(4) An increase in tax under paragraph (1) shall not be treated as tax imposed by this part for purposes of determining the amount of any credit allowable under this part.

(j) In the case of an estate or trust, both of the following apply:

(1) The qualified wages for a taxable year shall be apportioned between the estate or trust and the beneficiaries on the basis of the income of the estate or trust allocable to each.

(2) A beneficiary to whom any qualified wages have been apportioned under paragraph (1) shall be treated, for purposes of this part, as the employer with respect to those wages.

(k) In the case in which the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and the succeeding four years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(l) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(m) (1) Upon the effective date of this section, the Department of Finance shall estimate the total dollar amount of credits that will be claimed under this section with respect to each fiscal year from the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board shall annually provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by no later than March 1, a report of the total dollar amount of the credits claimed under this section with respect to the relevant fiscal year. The report shall compare the total dollar amount of credits claimed under this section with respect to that fiscal year with the department’s estimate with respect to that same fiscal year. If the total dollar amount of credits claimed for the fiscal year is less than the estimate for that fiscal year, the report shall identify options for
 increasing annual claims of the credit so as to meet estimated amounts.

(B) Beginning March 1, 2025, the report required by this paragraph shall include information relating to the total dollar amount of the credits claimed under this section by qualified taxpayers described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b).

(n) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), this section shall continue to be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but only with respect to qualified full-time employees who commenced employment with a qualified taxpayer in a designated census tract or economic development area in a
 taxable year beginning before January 1, 2026.

(3) This section shall remain operative for any qualified taxpayer with respect to any qualified full-time employee after the designated census tract is no longer designated or an economic development area ceases to be an economic development area, as defined in this section, for the remaining period, if any, of the 60-month period after the original date of hiring of an otherwise qualified full-time employee and any wages paid or incurred with respect to those qualified full-time employees after the designated census tract is no longer designated or an economic development area ceases to be an economic development area, as defined in this section, shall be treated as qualified wages under this section, provided the employee satisfies any other requirements of paragraphs (13) and (15) of subdivision (b), as if the designated census tract was still designated and binding or the economic development
 area was still in existence.

(o) For purposes of complying with Section 41 as it relates to the amendments made to this section and Section 23626 by the act adding this subdivision, hereafter the “expansion of the credit,” the Legislature finds as follows:

(1) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the expansion of the credit is to incentivize semiconductor, lithium production and manufacturing, and electric airplane companies to invest in California-based operations.

(2) The performance indicator for the Legislature to use in determining whether the expansion of the credit is achieving the stated goal, purpose, and objective is the total dollar amount of credits claimed by taxpayers engaged in semiconductor manufacturing, semiconductor research and development, lithium production and manufacturing, and
 electric airplane manufacturing, as reported pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of this section and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (l) of Section 23626.

(p) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed on December 1, 2029, as prescribed in subd. (n).)
-------------------------------------------

17053.75.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and except as provided in subdivision (b), there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to the greater of the following:

(1) Dues paid in that taxable year by the qualified taxpayer multiplied by the workers’ tax credit adjustment factor.

(2) The amount equal to dues paid in that taxable year by the qualified taxpayer, not to exceed an amount set pursuant to subdivision (b) of up to one hundred dollars ($100), recomputed annually beginning January 1, 2025, in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision
 (h) of Section 17041.

(b) (1) Unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, or a bill providing for appropriations related to the annual Budget Act, enacted after May 1, 2024, the workers’ tax credit adjustment factor shall be 0 percent for that year, and the dollar amount allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be zero dollars ($0) for that taxable year.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the workers’ tax credit adjustment factor and the maximum dollar amount allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be set in a manner to limit the annual revenue loss resulting from this section to no more than four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000).

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Bona fide labor organization” means a labor organization that satisfies all of the following:

(A) Is exempt from income taxes pursuant to Section 23701a.

(B) Actually represents employees in California as to wages, hours, and working conditions.

(C) Its officers have been democratically elected by its membership or otherwise in a manner consistent with federal law.

(D) Is free of domination or interference by any employer and has received no improper assistance or support from any employer.

(2) “Dues” means the amount paid or incurred during the taxable year by a taxpayer for dues or dues equivalents paid to a bona fide
 labor organization.

(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means an individual who satisfies both of the following:

(A) Is represented for purposes of collective bargaining by, and who pays dues or dues equivalents to, a bona fide labor organization.

(B) Meets any of the following requirements:

(i) Has wages subject to withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(ii) Is a provider of in-home supportive services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or pursuant to Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(iii) Is a provider of waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) The credit allowed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be in lieu of any other credit or deduction that the qualified taxpayer may otherwise be allowed under this part with respect to amounts taken into account in calculating the credit allowed by this section.

(e) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(f) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares the following:

(A) The purpose of the credit allowed under this section is to help individuals with the cost of being a member of a union.

(B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use when measuring whether the tax expenditure meets the goals, purposes, and objectives shall be the total number of returns claiming the credit and the aggregate dollar amount of credits claimed.

(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, beginning in the 2026 calendar year and then on an annual basis each year thereafter, while the credit is in effect, on the total number of returns claiming the credit and the aggregate
 dollar amount of credits claimed for the most recent taxable year for which information is available.

(B) The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 737, Sec. 3.   (AB 158)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.80.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer that employs an eligible individual a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount as determined pursuant to paragraph (2), not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per taxpayer per taxable year.

(2) A qualified taxpayer shall be allowed the credit pursuant to this section in the following amounts per taxable year:

(A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each eligible individual that works at least 500 hours, but fewer than 1,000 hours, for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which
 the credit is claimed.

(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each eligible individual that works at least 1,000 hours, but fewer than 1,500 hours, for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.

(C) Seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each eligible individual that works at least 1,500 hours, but fewer than 2,000 hours, for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.

(D) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each eligible individual that works at least 2,000 hours for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Continuum of care” has the
 same meaning as in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Coordinated entry system” means a centralized or coordinated assessment system developed pursuant to Section 578.7 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, designed to coordinate homelessness program participant intake, assessment, and provision of referrals.

(3) “Eligible employer” means a taxpayer that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Pays wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) Pays at least 120 percent of minimum wage.

(C) Provides to the Franchise Tax Board, upon request, a copy of the certification
 received for each eligible individual for each tax year that the credit is claimed for that eligible individual by that eligible employer.

(4) “Eligible individual” means a person who meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The person is homeless or has received supportive services from a homeless services provider, as designated by a local continuum of care or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, on the date of the hire or anytime during the 180-day period immediately before the hire.

(B) The person has been issued a certification pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and that certification has not expired.

(5) “Homeless Management
 Information System” has the same meaning as in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations. “Homeless Management Information System” includes the use of a comparable database by a victim services provider or legal services provider that is permitted by the federal government under Part 576 (commencing with Section 576.1) of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Person is homeless” means the same as “homeless” as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(7) “Minimum wage” means the wage established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(8) “Qualified taxpayer” means an eligible employer that pays wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment
 Insurance Code to an eligible individual.

(c) (1) A credit shall not be allowed under this section unless the eligible employer submits to the Franchise Tax Board, upon request, a certification issued by a continuum of care, or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, or other program as specified by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) A continuum of care or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, shall issue certifications for eligible individuals.

(3) The certification pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be issued in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(4) A certification issued pursuant to this subdivision shall expire one year after issuance.

(5) An eligible individual may receive a new certification pursuant to this subdivision if they are homeless or have received supportive services from a homeless services provider, as designated by a local continuum of care or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, on the date that the eligible individual receives a new certification or anytime during the 180-day period immediately before that date.

(d) (1) The total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated by credit reservations per calendar year to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section and Section 23629 shall not exceed thirty
 million dollars ($30,000,000), plus the unallocated credit amount, if any, from the preceding calendar year.

(2) (A) To be eligible for the credit allowed by this section with respect to an eligible individual, a qualified taxpayer shall request a credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, consistent with either of the following, as applicable:

(i) Within 30 days of hiring an eligible individual.

(ii) Within 60 days of receiving a new certification pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(B) To obtain a credit reservation with respect to an eligible individual, the qualified taxpayer shall provide necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax
 Board, including the name, social security number, how many hours the eligible individual is expected to work for the next 12 months, and the start date of employment.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall do both of the following:

(A) Approve a tentative credit reservation with respect to an eligible individual.

(B) Subject to the annual cap established as provided in paragraph (1), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 23629, and allocate any carryover of unallocated credits from prior years.

(e) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding two years if necessary, until the credit is
 exhausted.

(f) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, a deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount of wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer as a trade or business expense to an eligible individual shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed by this section.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(h) This section shall remain in effect
 only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 208.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.82.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, to a qualified taxpayer in an amount equal to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means an equity licensee that has received approval, including approval contingent upon the availability of funds, for the fee waiver and deferral program established pursuant to Section 26249 of the Business and Professions Code, as administered by the Department of Cannabis Control.

(c) On January 1, 2024, and every 6 months thereafter, the Department of Cannabis Control
 shall provide the Franchise Tax Board with a list of qualified taxpayers for the purposes of administering this section. The Department of Cannabis Control may satisfy this requirement by maintaining a database that makes this information available to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding seven years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline,
 or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(f) This section and Section 23682 shall be known and may be cited as the Cannabis Equity Tax Credit.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 15.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.85.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to the applicable percentage, as specified in paragraph (4), of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(2) The credit shall be
 allowed for the taxable year in which the California Film Commission issues the credit certificate pursuant to subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture, and shall be for the applicable percentage of all qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer in all taxable years for that qualified motion picture.

(3) The amount of the credit allowed to a qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(4) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), the applicable percentage shall be:

(A) Twenty percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(B) Twenty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California where the qualified motion picture is a television series that relocated to California or an independent film.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ancillary product” means any article for sale to the public that contains a portion of, or any element of, the qualified motion picture.

(2) “Budget” means an estimate of all expenses paid or incurred during the production period of a qualified motion picture. It shall be the same budget used by the qualified taxpayer and production company for all qualified motion picture purposes.

(3) “Clip use” means a use of any portion of a motion picture, other than the
 qualified motion picture, used in the qualified motion picture.

(4) “Credit certificate” means the certificate issued by the California Film Commission pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(5) (A) “Employee fringe benefits” means the amount allowable as a deduction under this part to the qualified taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture, exclusive of any amounts contributed by employees, for any year during the production period with respect to any of the following:

(i) Employer contributions under any pension, profit-sharing, annuity, or similar plan.

(ii) Employer-provided coverage under any accident or health plan for employees.

(iii) The employer’s cost of life or disability insurance provided to employees.

(B) Any amount treated as wages under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (18) shall not be taken into account under this paragraph.

(6) “Independent film” means a motion picture with a minimum budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and a maximum budget of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) that is produced by a company that is not publicly traded and publicly traded companies do not own, directly or indirectly, more than 25 percent of the producing company.

(7) “Licensing” means any grant of rights to distribute the qualified motion picture, in whole or in part.

(8) “New use” means any use of a motion
 picture in a medium other than the medium for which it was initially created.

(9) (A) “Postproduction” means the final activities in a qualified motion picture’s production, including editing, foley recording, automatic dialogue replacement, sound editing, scoring and music editing, beginning and end credits, negative cutting, negative processing and duplication, the addition of sound and visual effects, soundmixing, film-to-tape transfers, encoding, and color correction.

(B) “Postproduction” does not include the manufacture or shipping of release prints.

(10) “Preproduction” means the process of preparation for actual physical production which begins after a qualified motion picture has received a firm agreement of financial commitment, or is greenlit, with, for example, the establishment of a
 dedicated production office, the hiring of key crew members, and includes, but is not limited to, activities that include location scouting and execution of contracts with vendors of equipment and stage space.

(11) “Principal photography” means the phase of production during which the motion picture is actually shot, as distinguished from preproduction and postproduction.

(12) “Production period” means the period beginning with preproduction and ending upon completion of postproduction.

(13) “Qualified entity” means a personal service corporation as defined in Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, a payroll services corporation, or any entity receiving qualified wages with respect to services performed by a qualified individual.

(14) (A) “Qualified individual” means any individual who performs services during the production period in an activity related to the production of a qualified motion picture.

(B) “Qualified individual” shall not include either of the following:

(i) Any individual related to the qualified taxpayer as described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of Section 51(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in Section 416(i)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the qualified taxpayer.

(15) (A) “Qualified motion picture” means a motion picture that is produced for distribution to the general public, regardless of medium, that is one of the following:

(i) A feature with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and a maximum production budget of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000).

(ii) A movie of the week or miniseries with a minimum production budget of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(iii) A new television series produced in California with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) licensed for original distribution on basic cable.

(iv) An independent film.

(v) A television series that relocated to California.

(B) To qualify as a “qualified motion picture,” all of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(i) At least 75 percent of the production days occur wholly in California or 75 percent of the production budget is incurred for payment for services performed within the state and the purchase or rental of property used within the state.

(ii) Production of the qualified motion picture is completed within 30 months from the date on which the qualified taxpayer’s application is approved by the California Film Commission. For purposes of this section, a qualified motion picture is “completed” when the process of postproduction has been finished.

(iii) The copyright for the motion picture is registered with the United States Copyright Office pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code.

(iv) Principal photography of the qualified motion picture commences after the date on which the application is approved
 by the California Film Commission, but no later than 180 days after the date of that approval.

(C) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), in computing the total wages paid or incurred for the production of a qualified motion picture, all amounts paid or incurred by all persons or entities that share in the costs of the qualified motion picture shall be aggregated.

(D) “Qualified motion picture” shall not include commercial advertising, music videos, a motion picture produced for private noncommercial use, such as weddings, graduations, or as part of an educational course and made by students, a news program, current events or public events program, talk show, game show, sporting event or activity, awards show, telethon or other production that solicits funds, reality television program, clip-based programming if more than 50 percent of the content is comprised of licensed footage,
 documentaries, variety programs, daytime dramas, strip shows, one-half hour (air time) episodic television shows, or any production that falls within the recordkeeping requirements of Section 2257 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(16) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture and payments, including qualified wages, for services performed within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(17) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer who has paid or incurred qualified expenditures and has been issued a credit certificate by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the determination
 of whether a taxpayer is a qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section is not allowed to the pass-thru entity, but shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this paragraph, “pass-thru entity” means any entity taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(18) (A) “Qualified wages” means all of the following:

(i) Any wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that were paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of a qualified motion picture with respect to a qualified individual for services performed on the qualified motion picture production within this
 state.

(ii) The portion of any employee fringe benefits paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture that are properly allocable to qualified wage amounts described in clause (i).

(iii) Any payments made to a qualified entity for services performed in this state by qualified individuals within the meaning of paragraph (14).

(iv) Remuneration paid to an independent contractor who is a qualified individual for services performed within this state by that qualified individual.

(B) “Qualified wages” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Expenses, including wages, related to new use, reuse, clip use, licensing, secondary markets, or residual
 compensation, or the creation of any ancillary product, including, but not limited to, a soundtrack album, toy, game, trailer, or teaser.

(ii) Expenses, including wages, paid or incurred with respect to acquisition, development, turnaround, or any rights thereto.

(iii) Expenses, including wages, related to financing, overhead, marketing, promotion, or distribution of a qualified motion picture.

(iv) Expenses, including wages, paid per person per qualified motion picture for writers, directors, music directors, music composers, music supervisors, producers, and performers, other than background actors with no scripted lines.

(19) “Residual compensation” means supplemental compensation paid at the time that a motion picture is exhibited through new use,
 reuse, clip use, or in secondary markets, as distinguished from payments made during production.

(20) “Reuse” means any use of a qualified motion picture in the same medium for which it was created, following the initial use in that medium.

(21) “Secondary markets” means media in which a qualified motion picture is exhibited following the initial media in which it is exhibited.

(22) “Television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial media exhibition, that filmed all of its prior season or seasons outside of California and for which the taxpayer certifies that the credit provided pursuant to this section is the primary reason for relocating to California.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified taxpayer may sell any credit allowed under this section that is attributable to an independent film, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), to an unrelated party.

(2) The qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board prior to the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, all required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the qualified taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(3) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable
 year, and succeeding five taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(4) A credit shall not be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one taxpayer, nor may the credit be resold by the unrelated party to another taxpayer or other party.

(5) A party that has acquired tax credits under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this section.

(6) In no event may a qualified taxpayer assign or sell any tax credit to the extent the tax credit allowed by this section is claimed on any tax return of the qualified taxpayer.

(7) In the event that both the taxpayer originally allocated a credit under this section by the California Film Commission and a taxpayer to whom the credit has been sold both claim the same amount of
 credit on their tax returns, the Franchise Tax Board may disallow the credit of either taxpayer, so long as the statute of limitations upon assessment remains open.
